lib/dict/lt.aff
SFX Q as      esniàja         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniojoj        [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniojoje       [^i]as
SFX Q ias     esnioji         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniosios       [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniajai        [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniàjà         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniàja         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniojoj        [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniojoje       [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tesnioji        èias
SFX Q èias    tesniosios      èias
SFX Q èias    tesniajai       èias
SFX Q èias    tesniàjà        èias
SFX Q èias    tesniàja        èias
SFX Q èias    tesniojoj       èias
SFX Q èias    tesniojoje      èias
SFX Q us      esnioji         us
SFX Q us      esniosios       us
SFX Q us      esniajai        us
SFX Q us      esniàjà         us
SFX Q us      esniàja         us
SFX Q us      esniojoj        us
SFX Q us      esniojoje       us
SFX Q as      esnieji         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniøjø         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniesiems      [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniuosius      [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniaisiais     [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniuosiuose    [^i]as
SFX Q ias     esnieji         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniøjø         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniesiems      [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniuosius      [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniaisiais     [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniuosiuose    [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tesnieji        èias
SFX Q èias    tesniøjø        èias
SFX Q èias    tesniesiems     èias
SFX Q èias    tesniuosius     èias
SFX Q èias    tesniaisiais    èias
SFX Q èias    tesniuosiuose   èias
SFX Q us      esnieji         us
SFX Q us      esniøjø         us
SFX Q us      esniesiems      us
SFX Q us      esniuosius      us
SFX Q us      esniaisiais     us
SFX Q us      esniuosiuose    us
SFX Q as      esniosioms      [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniàsias       [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniosiomis     [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniosiose      [^i]as
SFX Q ias     esniosioms      [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniàsias       [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniosiomis     [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     esniosiose      [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tesniosioms     èias
SFX Q èias    tesniàsias      èias
SFX Q èias    tesniosiomis    èias
SFX Q èias    tesniosiose     èias
SFX Q us      esniosioms      us
SFX Q us      esniàsias       us
SFX Q us      esniosiomis     us
SFX Q us      esniosiose      us
SFX Q as      ëlesnis         [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesnio         [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniam        [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesná          [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniu         [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniame       [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ëlesnis         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesnio         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniam        [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesná          [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniu         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniame       [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnis        èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnio        èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniam       èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesná         èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniu        èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniame      èias
SFX Q us      ëlesnis         us
SFX Q us      ëlesnio         us
SFX Q us      ëlesniam        us
SFX Q us      ëlesná          us
SFX Q us      ëlesniu         us
SFX Q us      ëlesniame       us
SFX Q as      ëlesnë          [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesnës         [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesnei         [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesnæ          [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesne          [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesnëje        [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ëlesnë          [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesnës         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesnei         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesnæ          [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesne          [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesnëje        [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnë         èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnës        èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnei        èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnæ         èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesne         èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnëje       èias
SFX Q us      ëlesnë          us
SFX Q us      ëlesnës         us
SFX Q us      ëlesnei         us
SFX Q us      ëlesnæ          us
SFX Q us      ëlesne          us
SFX Q us      ëlesnëje        us
SFX Q as      ëlesni          [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniø         [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniems       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesnius        [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniais       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniuose      [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ëlesni          [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniø         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniems       [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesnius        [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniais       [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniuose      [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tëlesni         èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniø        èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniems      èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnius       èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniais      èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniuose     èias
SFX Q us      ëlesni          us
SFX Q us      ëlesniø         us
SFX Q us      ëlesniems       us
SFX Q us      ëlesnius        us
SFX Q us      ëlesniais       us
SFX Q us      ëlesniuose      us
SFX Q as      ëlesnëms        [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesnes         [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesnëmis       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesnëse        [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ëlesnëms        [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesnes         [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesnëmis       [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesnëse        [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnëms       èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnes        èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnëmis      èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnëse       èias
SFX Q us      ëlesnëms        us
SFX Q us      ëlesnes         us
SFX Q us      ëlesnëmis       us
SFX Q us      ëlesnëse        us
SFX Q as      ëlesnysis       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniojo       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniajam      [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesnájá        [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniuoju      [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniajame     [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ëlesnysis       [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniojo       [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniajam      [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesnájá        [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniuoju      [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniajame     [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnysis      èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniojo      èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniajam     èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnájá       èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniuoju     èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniajame    èias
SFX Q us      ëlesnysis       us
SFX Q us      ëlesniojo       us
SFX Q us      ëlesniajam      us
SFX Q us      ëlesnájá        us
SFX Q us      ëlesniuoju      us
SFX Q us      ëlesniajame     us
SFX Q as      ëlesnioji       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniosios     [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniajai      [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniàjà       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniàja       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniojoj      [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniojoje     [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ëlesnioji       [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniosios     [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniajai      [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniàjà       [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniàja       [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniojoje     [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniojoj      [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnioji      èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniosios    èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniajai     èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniàjà      èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniàja      èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniojoje    èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniojoj     èias
SFX Q us      ëlesnioji       us
SFX Q us      ëlesniosios     us
SFX Q us      ëlesniajai      us
SFX Q us      ëlesniàjà       us
SFX Q us      ëlesniàja       us
SFX Q us      ëlesniojoje     us
SFX Q us      ëlesniojoj      us
SFX Q as      ëlesnieji       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniøjø       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniesiems    [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniuosius    [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniaisiais   [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniuosiuose  [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ëlesnieji       [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniøjø       [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniesiems    [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniuosius    [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniaisiais   [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniuosiuose  [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tëlesnieji      èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniøjø      èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniesiems   èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniuosius   èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniaisiais  èias
