lib/dict/lt.dic
abejutiğkas/BNQ
adekvatus/BNQ
şaibingas/BNQ
şaislus/BNQ
şaizdotas/BNQ
akytas/BNQ
ğakotas/BNQ
şalas/BNQ
ğaliğkas/BNQ
ğalnotas/BNQ
şaltiğkas/BNQ
şambuotas/BNQ
şandingas/BNQ
şangus/BNQ
anonimiğkas/BNQ
antonimiğkas/BNQ
apgamuotas/BNQ
apkalbus/BNQ
aprëpiamas/BNQ
apvalus/BNQ
arèiausias/BQ
artus/BNQ
atşagarias/BNQ
atgaivingas/BNQ
atkaklus/BNQ
atletiğkas/BNQ
atrankus/BNQ
atskalûniğkas/BNQ
atşvalgus/BNQ
augus/BNQ
ğaunus/BNQ
autoritetingas/BNQ
baikğtus/BNQ
balsingas/BNQ
banalus/BNQ
batuotas/BNQ
beatodairiğkas/BNQ
benzinuotas/BNQ
betarpiğkas/BNQ
biurokratiğkas/BNQ
blandus/BNQ
bodus/BNQ
braziliğkas/BNQ
bruzgus/BNQ
buolas/BNQ
ciniğkas/BNQ
dagus/BNQ
daktariğkas/BNQ
daniğkas/BNQ
darganotas/BNQ
daugiaprasmiğkas/BNQ
dedervinëtas/BNQ
delikatus/BNQ
dervotas/BNQ
diametralus/BNQ
dievotas/BNQ
dirşingas/BNQ
dyglus/BNQ
ádëmus/BNQ
dorybingas/BNQ
dramblotas/BNQ
drëbtas/BNQ
dryşëtas/BNQ
drumstas/BNQ
druskëtas/BNQ
dukslus/BNQ
duobëtas/BNQ
durpingas/BNQ
dvasingas/BNQ
dviprasmiğkas/BNQ
eşeruotas/BNQ
egzotiğkas/BNQ
einus/BNQ
ekstensyvus/BNQ
elegantiğkas/BNQ
şelvas/BNQ
èempëtas/BNQ
epizodiğkas/BNQ
ğeriuotas/BNQ
esmingas/BNQ
familiarus/BNQ
filosofiğkas/BNQ
fragmentiğkas/BNQ
gairingas/BNQ
galantiğkas/BNQ
gamtiğkas/BNQ
gardus/BNQ
gaudus/BNQ
geibus/BNQ
geltas/BNQ
gerağirdiğkas/BNQ
gişlus/BNQ
girgşdus/BNQ
gyvenimiğkas/BNQ
glûdus/BNQ
glodus/BNQ
gobğtus/BNQ
grafiğkas/BNQ
graudingas/BNQ
greitas/BNQ
griovëtas/BNQ
groteskiğkas/BNQ
gruoblëtas/BNQ
gumburiuotas/BNQ
hebrajiğkas/BNQ
ğiaudinas/BNQ
áğiaurus/BNQ
identiğkas/BNQ
ğieninas/BNQ
iğilgas/BNQ
iğkilus/BNQ
ilgas/BNQ
ğiltas/BNQ
impulsyvus/BNQ
inertiğkas/BNQ
şinomas/BNQ
intravertiğkas/BNQ
iğraiğkingas/BNQ
ğirmas/BNQ
ispaniğkas/BNQ
iteratyvus/BQ
èişuotas/BNQ
ydingas/BNQ
ğyvas/BNQ
jauslus/BNQ
judrus/BNQ
juokingas/BNQ
kabus/BNQ
kaitus/BNQ
kalkëtas/BNQ
kalus/BNQ
kamuoliğkas/BNQ
ákandus/BNQ
kardinalus/BNQ
karpotas/BNQ
kasus/BNQ
kaulëtas/BNQ
kekiğkas/BNQ
kelmiğkas/BNQ
keringas/BNQ
keturğakas/BNQ
kiauliğkas/BNQ
kietas/BNQ
kimus/BNQ
kirğus/BNQ
klaidus/BNQ
kleidus/BNQ
klijingas/BNQ
klupus/BNQ
knibus/BNQ
koktus/BNQ
komediğkas/BNQ
konceptualus/BNQ
konstruktyvus/BNQ
korëtas/BNQ
kramtus/BNQ
kreditingas/BNQ
kriauğingas/BNQ
kryşmas/BNQ
krumpliuotas/BNQ
ëkğtus/BNQ
kuplus/BNQ
kutuotas/BNQ
labdaringas/BNQ
laimus/BNQ
laisvanoriğkas/BNQ
ğlakuotas/BNQ
lapuotas/BNQ
ledinuotas/BNQ
lemtingas/BNQ
liaudiğkas/BNQ
liemeningas/BNQ
ligûstas/BNQ
lipğnus/BNQ
lydus/BNQ
ğlykğtus/BNQ
logiğkas/BNQ
ğlovingas/BNQ
lupus/BNQ
maiğytas/BNQ
makotas/BNQ
maniakiğkas/BNQ
marginiuotas/BNQ
marğus/BNQ
matus/BNQ
mechanizuotas/BNQ
meğkiğkas/BNQ
menamas/BNQ
metus/BNQ
mielinas/BNQ
miklus/BNQ
minimalus/BNQ
mëğlungiğkas/BNQ
molinas/BNQ
màslus/BNQ
nacionaliğkas/BNQ
natûralus/BNQ
neigiamas/BNQ
nepakeliamas/BNQ
niaurus/BNQ
nykus/BNQ
nuobodus/BNQ
nuolinkas/BNQ
nusikalstamas/BNQ
şolëtas/BNQ
paşangus/BNQ
pagieşus/BNQ
pakabus/BNQ
palaimintas/BNQ
paşodiğkas/BNQ
parsidavëliğkas/BNQ
pasyvus/BNQ
patetiğkas/BNQ
pavasaringas/BNQ
peleningas/BNQ
permatomas/BNQ
pigus/BNQ
pinigingas/BNQ
platoniğkas/BNQ
plynas/BNQ
poringas/BNQ
prakaituotas/BNQ
prantnus/BNQ
prekingas/BNQ
prielaidus/BNQ
principingas/BNQ
progresyvus/BNQ
psichologiğkas/BNQ
pusmirkas/BNQ
raibas/BNQ
rantytas/BNQ
raupuotas/BNQ
reèiuotas/BNQ
rezervuotas/BNQ
ristas/BNQ
rûkuotas/BNQ
rumbuotas/BNQ
sakingas/BNQ
santûrus/BNQ
savanaudiğkas/BNQ
savotiğkas/BNQ
sensacingas/BNQ
sielvartingas/BNQ
sàşiningas/BNQ
skalus/BNQ
skiauterëtas/BNQ
sëklingas/BNQ
skubinas/BNQ
slenkstëtas/BNQ
smalstus/BNQ
sàmoningas/BNQ
snobiğkas/BNQ
spazmiğkas/BNQ
sportiğkas/BNQ
sravus/BNQ
stamantrus/BNQ
stichiğkas/BNQ
stropus/BNQ
suğnekamas/BNQ
svaigus/BNQ
svogûnuotas/BNQ
talpus/BNQ
tarmiğkas/BNQ
techniğkas/BNQ
tendencingas/BNQ
tikroviğkas/BNQ
tykus/BNQ
ğëtoniğkas/BNQ
trejopas/BNQ
trûkstamas/BNQ
tulşingas/BNQ
tvirtas/BNQ
áşulnus/BNQ
uolingas/BNQ
utilitarus/BNQ
şvaigşdëtas/BNQ
ğvaistus/BNQ
valdus/BNQ
şvalus/BNQ
variantiğkas/BNQ
vasarinas/BNQ
veiksmingas/BNQ
veşlus/BNQ
verpetuotas/BNQ
ğvieşias/BNQ
vienodas/BNQ
vikiuotas/BNQ
vinguliuotas/BNQ
visiğkas/BNQ
vyğniuotas/BNQ
vogiuotas/BNQ
zuikiğkas/BNQ
